Arkansas, session 2025, HB1977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Parents of young children have a right to determine when and
how their children should be educated about sex;
(2) Children’s sections of public libraries and public school
libraries have traditionally taken care to curate materials that are age-
appropriate for children;
(3) Exposure to a wide range of books is important for the
educational development of Arkansas children;
(4) Children should be able to freely browse books within a
children’s library section without exposure to sexually explicit material or
to sex education materials without parental consent; and
(5) Taxpayer-funded libraries should assist parents in
facilitating educational opportunities for their children by ensuring
children’s library sections provide age-appropriate materials free of
sexually explicit material.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
*SSS313*
04/02/2025 3:37:21 PM SSS313

HB1977
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Protecting Childhood
Innocence in Libraries Act".

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 21, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-21-122. Sexually explicit material in children's library areas
prohibited —— Cause of action —— Definitions.
(a) A public school library in this state shall take reasonable steps
to ensure that sexually explicit material is not located on open shelving
within children’s library areas.
(b) Sex education materials shall not be placed on open shelving
within a children’s library section but may be made accessible or checked out
by a child twelve (12) years of age or under upon parent or guardian request.
(c)(1) A parent or guardian whose child has been exposed to sexually
explicit material in a children’s section of a library has a private cause of
action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief against a public
school library that fails to take reasonable steps to place only age-
appropriate materials in a children’s library section.
(2) A civil action brought under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date of the cause of
action.
(3) An individual who prevails in a civil action under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section may recover from the public school library
that failed to take reasonable steps to avoid placing sexually explicit
material on open shelving within a children’s library section:
(A) Reasonable attorney fees; and
(B) Costs.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Age-appropriate material” means materials primarily for
children twelve (12) years of age and under that are free of sexually
explicit material;
(2) “Children’s library section” means sections of a library
that are organized primarily for children twelve (12) years of age and under;
(3) “Open shelving” means library shelving and library displays
where materials can be freely accessed by children without assistance;
(4) “Sex education materials” means materials that are designed
04/02/2025 3:37:21 PM SSS313

HB1977
to educate students about the facts of sexual reproduction; and
(5)(A) “Sexually explicit material” means material that depicts
or describes with a high level of graphic detail or descriptive language:
(i) The penetration of the anus or mouth of a person
by the penis of another person;
(ii) The penetration of the labia majora or anus of
a person by any bodily member or foreign instrument manipulated by another
person; or
(iii) Sexually explicit conduct as defined in § 5-
27-302.
(B) "Sexually explicit material" does not include:
(i) Sex education material; or
(ii) Material that mentions an occurrence of sexual
intercourse, sexual acts, or sexual attraction without a high level of
graphic detail or descriptive language.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 13, Chapter 2, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
13-2-108. Sexually explicit material in children's library areas
prohibited —— Cause of action —— Definitions.
(a) A taxpayer-funded library in this state shall take reasonable
steps to ensure that sexually explicit material is not located on open
shelving within children’s library areas.
(b) Sex education materials shall not be placed on open shelving
within a children’s library section but may be made accessible or checked out
by a child twelve (12) years of age or under upon parent or guardian request.
(c)(1) A parent or guardian whose child has been exposed to sexually
explicit material in a children’s section of a library has a private cause of
action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief against a taxpayer-
funded library that fails to take reasonable steps to place only age-
appropriate materials in a children’s library section.
(2) A civil action brought under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date of the cause of
action.
(3) An individual who prevails in a civil action under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section may recover from the taxpayer-funded
04/02/2025 3:37:21 PM SSS313

HB1977
library that failed to take reasonable steps to avoid placing sexually
explicit material on open shelving within a children’s library section:
(A) Reasonable attorney fees; and
(B) Costs.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Age-appropriate material” means materials primarily for
children twelve (12) years of age and under that are free of sexually
explicit material;
(2) “Children’s library section” means sections of a library
that are organized primarily for children twelve (12) years of age and under;
(3) “Open shelving” means library shelving and library displays
where materials can be freely accessed by children without assistance;
(4) “Sex education materials” means materials that are designed
to educate students about the facts of sexual reproduction;
(5)(A) “Sexually explicit material” means material that depicts
or describes with a high level of graphic detail or descriptive language:
(i) The penetration of the anus or mouth of a person
by the penis of another person;
(ii) The penetration of the labia majora or anus of
a person by any body member or foreign instrument manipulated by another
person; or
(iii) Sexually explicit conduct as defined in § 5-
27-302.
(B) "Sexually explicit material" does not include:
(i) Sex education material; or
(ii) Material that mentions an occurrence of sexual
intercourse, sexual acts, or sexual attraction without a high level of
graphic detail or descriptive language; and
(6) “Taxpayer-funded library” means a library that receives
funds from any type of state or local taxes, including without limitation a:
(A) County library; or
(B) Municipal library.




04/02/2025 3:37:21 PM SSS313